Wyoming, session 2025, SF0111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-16-105 is created to read:

SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
37-16-105. Treatment of new small customer
generators.

(a) Electric utilities shall compensate new small
customer-generators in accordance with subsections (b) and
(c) of this section.

(b) The public service commission shall establish an
appropriate compensation system to regulate the rates,
terms and conditions applied to new small
customer-generators by electric utilities for electricity
produced by new small customer-generators. The compensation
system shall provide for just and reasonable rates, terms
and conditions.

(c) Any cooperative electric utility that is exempt
from retail rate regulation by the public service
commission under chapter 17, title 37 of the Wyoming
statutes shall not be subject to subsection (b) of this
section and the board of directors of a cooperative
electric utility shall, not later than January 1, 2026,
adopt rates, terms and conditions to compensate new small
customer-generators and shall:
SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549

(i) Give written notice to all of its member
owners, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the
effective date of the cooperative's initial rates, terms
and conditions regarding compensation of new small
customer-generators and of the effective date of any
subsequent change to the rates, terms and conditions,
including procedures for the cooperative's member owners to
comment on proposed rates;

(ii) Rates, terms and conditions adopted by a
cooperative electric utility in accordance with this
subsection shall be filed with the commission; and

(iii) Be subject to the complaint, investigation
and resolution process pursuant to W.S. 37-17-104(d) and
(e) regarding the rates, terms and conditions adopted by
the board to compensate new small customer-generators.

Section 2. W.S. 37-16-101(a)(ii), (vii),
(viii)(intro), by creating new paragraphs (ix) and (x) and
(b), 37-16-102(a)(i) through (iii), 37-16-103(a)(intro),
(ii), (ii), (b) and 37-16-104 are amended to read:
SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549

37-16-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter unless the context or a
specific article otherwise requires:

(ii) "Small customer-generator" means a user of
a net metering customer electrical production system;

(vii) "Net metering" means measuring the
difference between the electricity supplied by an electric
utility and the electricity generated by a small
customer-generator that is fed back to the electric utility
over the applicable billing period;

(viii) "Net metering system" or "customer
electrical production system" means a facility for the
production of electrical energy that:

(ix) "Existing small customer-generator" means a
small customer generator that has a customer electrical
production system that they owned and operated on or before
December 31, 2025;
SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549

(x) "New small customer-generator" means a small
customer-generator that:

(A) Has a customer electrical production
system that first operates on or after January 1, 2026;

(B) Acquires an existing customer
electrical production system on or after January 1, 2026;

(C) Moves an existing customer electrical
production system to a new service location on or after
January 1, 2026. This subparagraph shall not apply to an
existing small customer-generator that is relocating a
customer electrical production system within the same
service location.

(b) A person acting as a small customer-generator
under this act shall not be considered a "public utility"
as defined by W.S. 37-1-101.

37-16-102. Electric utility requirements.

SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
(a) An electric utility:

(i) Shall offer to make available to each of its
eligible small customer-generators that has installed a net
metering system an energy meter that is capable of
registering the flow of electricity in two (2) directions;

(ii) May, at its own expense and with the
written consent of the customer-generator, install one (1)
or more additional meters to monitor the flow of
electricity in each direction;

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, shall not charge a an existing small
customer-generator any fee or charge that would increase
the existing small customer-generator's minimum monthly
charge to an amount greater than that of other customers of
the electric utility in the same rate class as the existing
small customer-generator.

37-16-103. Calculation requirements.

SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
(a) Consistent with other provisions of this chapter,
the net energy measurement for existing small
customer-generators shall be calculated in the following
manner:

(ii) If the electricity supplied by the electric
utility exceeds the electricity generated by the customer
generator existing small customer-generator, the existing
small customer-generator shall be billed for the
appropriate customer charges for that month, in accordance
with W.S. 37-16-102;

(iii) If the electricity supplied by the
existing small customer-generator exceeds that supplied by
the electric utility, the existing small customer-generator
shall be credited or compensated for the excess
kilowatt-hours generated during the month with the
kilowatt-hour credit or compensation appearing on the bill
for the following month for all metered locations of
existing small customer-generators supplied by the electric
utility.

SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
(b) At the beginning of each calendar year Annually,
at a date set by the electric utility, any remaining unused
kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous year
shall be sold to the electric utility, at the electric
utility's filed avoided cost.

37-16-104. Safety and performance requirements.

(a) A net metering system or customer electrical
production system used by a small customer-generator shall
meet all applicable safety and performance standards
established by the national electrical code, the institute
of electrical and electronics engineers and underwriters
laboratories.

(b) The small customer-generator shall at its expense
provide lockable, switching equipment capable of isolating
the net metering facility customer electrical production
system from the electric utility's system. Such equipment
shall be approved by the electric utility and shall be
accessible by the electric utility at all times.

SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
(c) The electric utility shall not be liable directly
or indirectly for permitting or continuing to allow an
attachment of a net metering facility customer electrical
production system, or for acts or omissions of the small
customer-generator that cause loss or injury, including
death, to any third party.

(d) The small customer-generator is responsible for
all costs associated with its facility and is also
responsible for all costs related to any modifications to
the facility that may be required by the electric utility
for purposes of safety and reliability.

(e) The commission, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment, may adopt by regulation additional
control and testing requirements for small
customer-generators that the commission determines are
necessary to protect public for safety and system
reliability.

Section 3. The public service commission of Wyoming
shall conduct public hearings related to the implementation
of the compensation system for electricity produced from
SF0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0549
new small customer-generators and shall adopt rules
necessary to implement the system as provided in W.S.
37-16-105(b) not later than December 31, 2025. Any
cooperative electric utility that is exempt from retail
rate regulation by the public service commission under
chapter 17, title 37 of the Wyoming statutes shall adopt
rates, terms and conditions to compensate small
customer-generators as provided in W.S. 37-16-105(c) not
later than January 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0111